Louisiana, session 2026, HB1009.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:99(A) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§99. Reckless operation of a vehicle
A. Reckless operation of a vehicle is any of the following:
(1) the The operation of any motor vehicle, aircraft, vessel, or other means
of conveyance in a criminally negligent or reckless manner.
(2) The operation of a motor vehicle at or above one hundred miles per hour.
* * *